District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.09

References to Department of Transportation (DOT).

Any reference in law or regulation to the Department of Transportation established by this chapter, or to its former acronym DOT shall be deemed to be a reference to the District Department of Transportation and to DDOT, respectively.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9a, formerly § 14
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 77(d), 52 DCR 2638
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(i), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 14 to § 9a.